Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2609
Tax Commissioner; duties; certain retailers and operators; reports required.

(1) If an application is approved, the Tax Commissioner shall:

(a) Audit or review audits of the approved convention and meeting center facility, sports arena facility, associated hotel, or nearby retailer to determine the state sales tax revenue collected by retailers and operators doing business at such facilities on sales at such facilities, state sales tax revenue collected on primary and secondary box office sales of admissions to such facilities, and state sales tax revenue collected by associated hotels and nearby retailers; and

(b) Certify annually the amount of state sales tax revenue collected by retailers and operators doing business at such facilities on sales at such facilities, state sales tax revenue collected on primary and secondary box office sales of admissions to such facilities, and state sales tax revenue collected by associated hotels and nearby retailers, to the State Treasurer.

(2) State sales tax revenue collected by retailers and operators that are not eligible facilities but are doing business at eligible facilities shall be reported on informational returns developed by the Department of Revenue and provided to any such retailers and operators by the eligible facility. The informational returns shall be submitted to the department by the retailer or operator by the twentieth day of the month following the month the sales taxes are collected. The Tax Commissioner shall use the data from the informational returns and sales tax returns of eligible facilities, associated hotels, and nearby retailers to determine the appropriate amount of state sales tax revenue.

(3) Changes made to the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act by Laws 2007, LB 551, shall apply to state sales tax revenue collected commencing on July 1, 2006.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB551, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 20.

Limitation on applications, see section 13-2612.